Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-649
Combined tax rate.

The commissioner shall, for each calendar year, determine the combined tax rate applicable to each employer on the basis of his or her actual experience in the payment of contributions and with respect to benefits charged against his or her separate experience account in accordance with sections 48-649.01 to 48-649.04.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 7, p. 382;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 5, p. 239;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 5, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-707;

R.S.1943, § 48-649;

Laws 1947, c. 175, § 10, p. 577;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 12, p. 427;

Laws 1953, c. 167, § 8, p. 533;

Laws 1955, c. 190, § 9, p. 548;

Laws 1972, LB 1392, § 8;

Laws 1976, LB 819, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 509, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 249, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 34;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 334, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 484, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 739, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB631, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 63.

Under the Nebraska Employment Security Law, the contribution type of financing as provided by section 48-649, R.R.S.1943, and reimbursement financing under section 48-660.01, R.R.S.1943, are separate and distinct systems, and a nonprofit organization must elect to use one or the other. West Nebraska General Hospital v. Hanlon, 208 Neb. 173, 302 N.W.2d 694 (1981).